Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1621.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Obesity treatment and prevention advisory council; membership; duties; reporting requirements; delayed repeal A. The obesity treatment and prevention advisory council is established consisting of the following members: 1. Two members of the senate who are from different political parties and who are appointed by the president of the senate. The president of the senate shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the advisory council. 2. Two members of the house of representatives who are from different political parties and who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate one of these members to serve as cochairperson of the advisory council. 3. The director of the Arizona health care cost containment system or the director's designee. 4. The director of the department of health services or the director's designee. 5. Two members who represent patient advocacy organizations with expertise in treating people living with obesity and who are appointed by the president of the senate. 6. Two members who represent medical societies or physician organizations or who are physicians with experience treating people living with obesity and who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 7. One member who is a registered dietitian with expertise in the therapeutic treatment of people living with obesity through diet, exercise, lifestyle changes or behavior modification and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. B. The advisory council shall meet at the call of the cochairpersons. The cochairpersons of the committee may establish subcommittees to address select issues and report to the advisory council as directed. c. The advisory council shall: 1. Analyze historical data and estimate the potential cost savings of providing medicaid coverage for preventative care. 2. Evaluate and recommend public policy and funding strategies. 3. Identify health care system gaps. 4. Produce a report providing guidance and recommendations to educate the public, the legislature and other government agencies and departments, as appropriate. d. On or before December 31, 2027 and December 31, 2028, the obesity treatment and prevention advisory council shall submit a report regarding the advisory council's activities, findings and recommendations for administrative or legislative action to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. e. This section is repealed from and after January 30, 2029.